Utah statutes.
58-40-4.   Board composition -- Duties -- Responsibilities.

(1)  There is created a Board of Recreational Therapy.  It shall be appointed in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(2)  The board shall consist of two master therapeutic recreational specialists, one therapeutic recreational specialist, one therapeutic recreational technician, and one member appointed from the general public.

(3)  The board's duties, functions, and responsibilities shall comply with Sections 58-1-202 through 58-1-203.

